Utah statutes.
67-16-4.   Improperly disclosing or using private, controlled, or protected information -- Using position to secure privileges or exemptions -- Accepting employment which would impair independence of judgment or ethical performance -- Exception.

(1) It is an offense for a public officer, public employee, or legislator, under circumstances not amounting to a violation of Section 63G-6-1001 or 76-8-105, to:

(a)  accept employment or engage in any business or professional activity that he might reasonably expect would require or induce him to improperly disclose controlled information that he has gained by reason of his official position;

(b)  disclose or improperly use controlled, private, or protected information acquired by reason of his official position or in the course of official duties in order to further substantially the officer's or employee's personal economic interest or to secure special privileges or exemptions for himself or others;

(c)  use or attempt to use his official position to:

(i)  further substantially the officer's or employee's personal economic interest; or

(ii)  secure special privileges or exemptions for himself or others;

(d)  accept other employment that he might expect would impair his independence of judgment in the performance of his public duties; or

(e)  accept other employment that he might expect would interfere with the ethical performance of his public duties.

(2) (a)  Subsection (1) does not apply to the provision of education-related services to public school students by public education employees acting outside their regular employment.

(b)  The conduct referred to in Subsection (2)(a) is subject to Section 53A-1-402.5.



Amended by Chapter 202, 2012 General Session

